Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.250

Adult education programs in common school districts, limitations—Certain federal programs, administration.

The state board for community and technical colleges and the state board of education are hereby authorized to permit, on an ad hoc basis, the common school districts to conduct pursuant to RCW 28B.50.530 a program in adult education in behalf of a college district when such program will not conflict with existing programs of the same nature and in the same geographical area conducted by the college districts: PROVIDED, That federal programs for adult education shall be administered by the state board for community and technical colleges, which agency is hereby declared to be the state educational agency primarily responsible for supervision of adult education in the public schools as defined by *RCW 28B.50.020.

[ 1991 c 238 s 46; 1969 ex.s. c 261 s 25; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.250. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 25.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 28B.50.020 appears to be erroneous. "Adult education" is defined in RCW 28B.50.030.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 261: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.

Community education programs: RCW 28A.620.020.